West Virginia, session 2026, SB1027.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. HIGHER EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAM. §18C-5-5. Eligibility for a grant. (a) A person is eligible for consideration for a grant if the person:(1) Is a citizen of the United States;(2) Has been a resident of the state for one year immediately preceding the date of application for a grant;(3) Meets the admission requirements of, and is admitted into, the approved institution of higher education to which admission is sought; and(4) Satisfactorily meets the qualifications of financial need, academic promise and academic achievement established by the vice chancellor. Program rules adopted under this article may not require possession of a high school diploma or high school equivalent credential for an applicant who is an eligible high school dual-enrollment student under subsection (b) of this section.(b) High school dual-enrollment eligibility.— Notwithstanding any provision of this code or any rule to the contrary, an applicant who is enrolled in the eleventh or twelfth grade of a secondary school in West Virginia shall be eligible for a grant under this article for the purpose of dual enrollment. provided that:The student meets the citizenship and state residency requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section;(1) The student is admitted to an approved institution of higher education as a dual-enrollment or early enrollment student for the coursework to be funded by the meeting any minimum criteria jointly established by the secondary school and the institution;(2) The student demonstrates financial need and academic promise consistent with the standards of this article, except that possession of a high school diploma or equivalent is not required so long as the student is in good academic standing and on track to graduate high school as certified by the secondary school;(3) The student satisfies all other general eligibility requirements of the program, including timely filing of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and any academic performance standards for renewal apart from high school completion.(c) The Higher Education Policy Commission shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3A-1 et seq. of this code to implement the provisions of this section. Including the provisions of subsection (b) of this section relating to high school dual-enrollment students including any necessary coordination with the State Board of Education and county boards. §18C-5-7. Higher education adult part-time student grant program. (a) There is established the Higher Education Adult Part-time Student Grant Program, referred to in this section as the HEAPS grant program. The grant program established and authorized by this section is administered by the vice chancellor for administration. Moneys appropriated or otherwise available for the grant program shall be allocated by line item to an appropriate account. Any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall be carried forward for use in the next fiscal year.(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to them:(1) "Approved distance education" means a course of study offered via electronic access that has been approved for inclusion in the applicant’s program of study by the eligible institution of higher education at which the applicant is enrolled or has been accepted for enrollment;(2) "Part-time" means enrollment for not less than three nor more than eleven semester or term hours: Provided, That in the case of enrollment in postsecondary certificate, industry recognized credential and other skill development programs in demand occupations in this state, "part-time" means enrollment on such basis as is established for the program in which enrolled;(3) "Satisfactory academic progress" means maintaining a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.0 on a 4.0 grading scale with a goal of obtaining a certificate, associate degree or bachelor’s degree. In the case of postsecondary certificate, industry recognized credential and other skill development programs, satisfactory academic progress means continuous advancement toward completion of the program on the normal schedule established for the program in which enrolled;(4) "Eligible institution" means:(A) Any community college; community and technical college; adult technical preparatory education program or training;(B) Any state college or university, as those terms are defined in section two, article one, chapter eighteen-b of this code;(C) Any approved institution of higher education as that term is defined in section two of this article; and(D) Any approved distance education, including world wide web based courses;(5) "Eligible program or programs" or "eligible course or courses" means, in addition to programs and courses offered by eligible institutions as defined in subdivision (4) of this subsection:(A) Programs and courses offered by any nationally accredited degree granting institution of higher learning permitted pursuant to section five, article three, chapter eighteen-b of this code and approved by the joint commission for vocational-technical-occupational education; and(B) Any postsecondary certificate, industry recognized credential and other skill development programs of study as defined in this section in a demand occupation in this state;(6) "State resident" means a student who has lived in West Virginia continuously for a minimum of twelve months immediately preceding the date of application for a HEAPS grant or renewal of a grant;(7) "Postsecondary certificate program" means an organized program of study, approved by the joint commission for vocational-technical-occupational education, with defined competencies or skill sets that may be offered for credit or noncredit and which culminates in the awarding of a certificate: Provided, That postsecondary certificate programs offered by eligible institutions as defined in subdivision (4) of this subsection do not require the approval of the joint commission for vocational-technical-occupational education;(8) "Demand occupation" means any occupation having documented verification from employers that job opportunities in that occupation are currently available or are projected to be available within a year within the state or regions of the state. The Joint Commission for Vocational-Technical-Occupational Education shall prepare and update annually a list of occupations that they determine meet the requirements of this definition;(9) "Industry-recognized credential program" means an organized program that meets nationally recognized standards in a particular industry, is approved by the joint commission for vocational-technical-occupational education and which culminates in the awarding of a certification or other credential commonly recognized in that industry: Provided, That industry recognized credential programs offered by eligible institutions as defined in subdivision (4) of this subsection do not require the approval of the Joint Commission for Vocational-Technical-Occupational Education; and(10) "Skill development program" means a structured sequence or set of courses, approved by the joint commission for vocational-technical-occupational education, with defined competencies that are designed to meet the specific skill requirements of an occupation and which culminates in the awarding of a certificate of completion that specifically lists the competencies or skills mastered: Provided, That skill development programs offered by eligible institutions as defined in subdivision (4) of this subsection do not require the approval of the joint commission.(c) A person is eligible for consideration for a HEAPS grant if the person:(1) Demonstrates that he or she has applied for, accepted, or both, other student financial assistance in compliance with federal financial aid rules, including the federal Pell grant;(2) Demonstrates financial need for funds, as defined by legislative rule;(3) Is a state resident and may not be considered a resident of any other state;(4) Is a United States citizen or permanent resident thereof;(5) Is not incarcerated in a correctional facility;(6) Is not in default on a higher education loan; and(7) Is enrolled in a program of study at less than the graduate level on a part-time basis in an eligible institution or program of study and is making satisfactory academic progress at the time of application: Provided, That the requirement that the student be making satisfactory academic progress may not preclude a HEAPS grant award to a student who has been accepted for enrollment in an eligible institution or program of study but has not yet been enrolled.(d) Each HEAPS grant award is eligible for renewal until the course of study is completed, but not to exceed an additional nine years beyond the first year of the award.(e) The Higher Education Policy Commission shall propose a legislative rule pursuant to article three-a, chapter twenty-nine-a of this code to implement the provisions of this section which shall be filed with the Legislative Oversight Commission on Education Accountability by September 1, 2003. The Legislature hereby declares that an emergency situation exists and, therefore, the policy commission may establish, by emergency rule, under the procedures of article three-a, chapter twenty-nine-a of this code, a rule to implement the provisions of this section, after approval by the Legislative Oversight Commission on Education Accountability.(f) The legislative rule shall provide at least the following:(1) That consideration of financial need, as required by subdivision (3), subsection (c) of this section, include the following factors:(A) Whether the applicant has dependents as defined by federal law;(B) Whether the applicant has any personal hardship as determined at the discretion of the vice chancellor for administration; and(C) Whether the applicant will receive any other source of student financial aid during the award period.(2) That an appropriate allocation process be provided for distribution of funds directly to the eligible institutions or programs based on the part-time enrollment figures of the prior year;(3) That not less than twenty-five percent of the funds appropriated in any one fiscal year be used to make grants to students enrolled in postsecondary certificate, industry recognized credential and other skill development programs of study: Provided, That after giving written notice to the Legislative Oversight Commission on Education Accountability, the vice chancellor for administration may allocate less than twenty-five percent of the funds for such grants;(4) That ten percent of the funds appropriated in any one fiscal year shall be granted to state community and technical colleges by the council for community and technical college education in accordance with a process specified in the rule for noncredit and customized training programs which further the economic development goals of the state, help meet the training and skill upgrade needs of employers in the state, and for which funds are not available from other sources;(5) That any funds not expended by an eligible institution or program at the end of each fiscal year shall be returned to the vice chancellor for administration for distribution under the provisions of this section;(6) That grants under this section shall be available for approved distance education throughout the calendar year, subject only to the availability of funds; and(7) That the amount of each HEAPS grant award be determined using the following guidelines:(A) The amount of any HEAPS grant awarded to a student per semester, term hour or program for those students who are enrolled in eligible institutions or programs operated under the jurisdiction of an agency of the state or a political subdivision thereof shall be based upon the following:(i) Actual cost of tuition and fees;(ii) The portion of the costs determined to be appropriate by the commission; and(iii) In addition to factors (i) and (ii) above, in determining the amount of the award, the vice chancellor may consider the demand for the program pursuant to subdivision (8), subsection (b) of this section; and(B) The amount of any HEAPS grant awarded to a student who is enrolled in any other eligible institution, program or course shall be no greater than the average amount for comparable programs or courses as determined pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (A) above.(g) The HEAPS grant program is subject to any provision of this article not inconsistent with the provisions of this section.(h) High school dual-enrollment eligibility.— An individual who is enrolled in the 11th or 12th grade of a secondary school in West Virginia is eligible for a HEAPS grant award, notwithstanding that the individual has not yet earned a high school diploma or high school equivalency credential, if the following conditions are met:(1) The student meets all of the eligibility criteria set forth in subsection (c) of this section, apart from high school completion. For purposes of applying subdivision (7), subsection (c) of this section, a high school student is considered "enrolled in a program of study" if the student has been accepted by an eligible institution or program for concurrent enrollment in an approved post-secondary certificate, industry-recognized credential course, or other skill development program;(2) The student's part-time enrollment in the post-secondary program is approved by the student's high school or county school system as an authorized dual-enrollment or career-technical education experience:(3) The administering entity may establish any additional reasonable requirements by rule to assure the student's readiness for the intended program, including a recommendation from a school counselor or a minimum high school grade point average.(4) A high school student meeting the conditions of this subsection may receive a HEAPS grant for tuition and mandatory costs of the post-secondary courses or program on the same basis as any other HEAPS award recipient. The grant award shall be paid directly to the eligible institution or program on behalf of the student and shall cover no more than the actual cost of the part-time enrollment.(5) The Council for Community and Technical College Education. in consultation with the State Board of Education, shall adapt any necessary administrative rules to implement this subsection. Priority for HEAPS grants shall continue to be given to adult learners and other traditional applicants. ARTICLE 9. WEST VIRGINIA INVESTs GRANT PROGRAM. §18C-9-5. Eligibility requirements; agreements. (a) To be eligible for a WV Invests Grant, an individual must satisfy the following requirements: (1) Be a citizen or legal resident of the United States and have been a resident of West Virginia for at least one year immediately preceding the date of application for a grant;(2) Have completed a secondary education program in a public, private, or home school; Have completed a secondary education program in a public, private, or home school; or, if the individual is currently enrolled in high school, be enrolled in the 11th or 12th grade in a public, private, or home secondary, school program in West Virginia and making adequate academic progress toward high school graduation;(3) Have not been previously awarded a post-secondary degree; (4) Be at least 18 years of age: Provided, That individuals younger than 18 years of age may qualify for the grant upon completion of a secondary education program in a public, private, or home school Be at least 18 years of age, or be a secondary student meeting the enrollment criteria of subdivision (2) of this subsection;(5) Meet the admission requirements of, and be admitted into, an eligible institution;(6) Satisfactorily meet any additional qualifications of enrollment, academic promise, or achievement as established by the council through rule;(7) Have filed a completed free application for federal student aid for the academic year in which the grant award is sought;(8) Be enrolled in an eligible post-secondary program;  (9) Be enrolled in at least six credit hours per semester; Be enrolled in at least six credit hours per semester or equivalent term, except as otherwise provided by rule for high school dual-enrollment students who may have a lower credit load per term;(10) Have completed a WV Invests Grant application as provided by the council in accordance with a schedule established by the council; and (11) Have, prior to the start of each academic year or prior to the initial academic period for which the student is enrolled if that period for which the student is enrolled is not the beginning of the academic year, taken a drug test administered by the eligible institution. If the individual tests positive, he or she shall take another drug test prior to the beginning of the next academic period.  If the results of the second test are positive, the individual shall complete a drug rehabilitation program as prescribed by the Vice Chancellor for Administration as a condition of continued eligibility for a WV Invests Grant.  The applicant shall be responsible for the actual cost of any drug tests required by this subdivision.(b) Each grant may be renewed until the course of study is completed as long as the following qualifications, as determined by the vice chancellor for administration and the council, are satisfied: (1) Maintaining satisfactory academic standing, including a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.0; (2) Making adequate progress toward completion of the eligible post-secondary program; (3) Satisfactory participation in a community service program authorized by the council. The council shall include in the legislative rules, required by §18C-9-4 of this code, provisions for the administration of community service requirements, including, but not limited to, requiring completion of at least eight hours of unpaid community service during the time of study, which may include, but is not limited to, participating with nonprofit, governmental, institutional, or community-based organizations designed to improve the quality of life for community residents, meet the needs of community residents, or foster civic responsibility;(4) Continued satisfaction of eligibility requirements provided by §18C-9-5(a) of this code; and(5) Satisfaction of any additional eligibility criteria established by the council through legislative rule.(c) Each recipient of a WV Invests Grant shall enter into an agreement with the vice chancellor for administration, which shall require repayment of an amount of the grant or grants awarded to the recipient, in whole or in part, if a recipient chooses to reside outside the state within two years following obtainment of the degree or certificate for which the grant or grants were awarded. The council may not require a recipient to repay grants, in whole or in part, unless the prospective recipient has been informed of this requirement in writing before initial acceptance of the grant award. Each WV Invests Grant agreement shall include the following: (1) Disclosure of the full terms and conditions under which assistance under this article is provided and under which repayment may be required; and (2) A description of the appeals procedure required to be established under this article.(d) WV Invests Grant recipients found to be in noncompliance with the agreement entered into under §18C-9-5(c) of this code shall be required to repay the amount of the grant awards received, plus interest, and, where applicable, reasonable collection fees, on a schedule and at a rate of interest prescribed in rules promulgated by the council. The council shall also provide for proration of the amount to be repaid by a recipient who maintains employment in the state for a period of time within the time period required under §18C-9-5(c) of this code.(e) A recipient is not in violation of an agreement entered into pursuant to §18C-9-5(c) of this code during any period in which the recipient is meeting any of the following conditions:(1) Pursuing a half-time course of study at an accredited institution of higher education;(2) Serving as a member of the armed services of the United States;(3) Failing to comply with the terms of the agreement due to death or permanent or temporary disability as established by sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; or(4) Satisfying the provisions of any additional repayment exemptions prescribed by the council through rule.